Utah statutes.
63G-13-304.   Expansion to similar pilot projects.

(1)  If one year after the pilot project memorandum of understanding is executed under Section 63G-13-301 the governor determines, after consultation with the commission, that the pilot project is successful, the governor may enter into one or more additional memorandum of understanding to create pilot projects similar to the pilot project with the State of Nuevo Leon, except that the governor may not enter into a similar pilot project memorandum of understanding with a country:

(a)  designated by the United States State Department as a state sponsor of terrorism in accordance with section 6(j) of the Export Administration Act, section 40 of the Arms Export Control Act, and section 620A of the Foreign Assistance Act;

(b)  against which the United States has declared war; or

(c)  against which the United States has imposed sanctions as listed under a sanctions program of the Office of Foreign Assets Control within the United States Department of Treasury.

(2)  After the governor has entered into one or more additional memorandum of understanding under Subsection (1), the governor, in consultation with the commission, may periodically evaluate whether to enter into additional pilot projects subject to the limitations of Subsections (1)(a) through (c).

(3) (a)  A memorandum of understanding creating a similar pilot project shall comply with the requirements of Section 63G-13-302.

(b)  A similar pilot project created under this section shall operate in a manner substantially similar to the pilot project with the State of Nuevo Leon implemented under this part.

